Hawaii, session 2025, HB1411.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that there is a shortage of affordable housing in Hawaii. Further, many workers face difficulty commuting to and from work.  Long commutes strain transportation infrastructure and exacerbate global warming by increasing the emissions of greenhouse gases from vehicles.  Long commute times also impair worker productivity and personal wellbeing, as well as harm the overall economic productivity of the State. Allowing people to live closer to where they work will help preserve infrastructure, reduce greenhouse gas emissions, improve workers' mental health, and help businesses by reducing commute times. The legislature also finds that housing development may displace or adversely affect people who live in the immediate vicinity of the projects, and that measures should be taken to reduce these effects.  Further, people often have strong ties to their communities including schools, social networks, and commercial establishments. Prioritizing affordable housing projects that grant preferences for applicants who live or work in the immediate vicinity of the projects will help alleviate the shortage of workforce housing, reduce traffic and emissions of greenhouse gases, mitigate adverse impacts from new development, and build stronger communities. SECTION 2.  Chapter 201H, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§201H-     Geographic preferences.  In developing projects under this chapter, the corporation may allow projects to grant preferences to housing units for applicants whose primary physical residence or place of employment is located within five miles of the project.  The corporation may adopt rules under chapter 91 to implement this section." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________